Hawaii statutes.
§712A-8 Notice of forfeiture
proceedings. Unless otherwise provided, whenever notice is required under
this chapter it shall be given in one of the following ways:

(a) If the owner's or interest-holder's name and
current address are known:

(i) By personal service; or

(ii) By mail;

(b) If the owner's or interest-holder's interest is
required by law to be on record with a state or federal agency in order to
perfect an interest in the property, but the person's current address is not
known, by mailing a copy of the notice by certified mail to any address on the
record; or

(c) If the owner's or interest-holder's address is
not known, and is not on record pursuant to paragraph (b), or if the person's
interest is not known, by publication in one issue of a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the seizure occurs. [L 1988, c 260, pt of §1,
§7; am L 1990, c 197, §1; am L 1991, c 166, §3; am L 1993, c 196, §1; am L
1996, c 104, §6]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next